Delaware, session 153, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend the Charter of the City of Harrington by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: 4.2. Enumeration of Powers. Not by way of limitation upon the scope of the powers vested in the City Council to exercise all powers delegated by this Charter or general law to the City (except as may expressly appear herein to the contrary), but rather by way of enumeration and example, the City Council is vested by this Charter with (among others) the following powers: 4.2.4. May impose and collect a lodging tax of no more than 3% of the rent, in addition to the amount imposed by the State under Chapter 61 of Title 30, for the occupancy of any room in a hotel, motel, or tourist home, as defined under Â§ 6101 of Title 30 of the Delaware Code, located within the boundaries of the City.